Utah statutes.
16-13-4.   General powers of business development corporation.
In furtherance of the purposes of a development corporation, and in addition
to the powers conferred on corporations by Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised
Business Corporation Act, such corporation, subject to the restrictions and
limitations contained in this act, shall have the following powers:
(1)  To borrow money from lenders, and otherwise incur indebtedness for any of
its purposes; to issue its bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness whether secured or unsecured therefor; and to secure the same by
mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or other lien on its property, franchises,
rights and privileges of every kind and nature or any part thereof.
(2)  To lend money to, and to guarantee, indorse, or act as surety on the
bonds, notes, contracts, or other obligations of, or otherwise assist
financially, any person, firm, corporation, or association, and to establish
and regulate the terms and conditions with respect to any such loans or
financial assistance and the charges for interest and service connected
therewith; provided, however, that the corporation may not approve any
application for a loan unless and until the applicant shall have shown that
the applicant has applied for the loan through ordinary financial channels and
that the loan has been refused by at least one financial institution doing
business in this state and, in the ordinary course of its business, granting
loans similar in amount and kind to the requested loan.
(3)  To purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to sell,
convey, mortgage, lease, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, upon such terms and
conditions as its board of directors may deem advisable, real and personal
property, together with such rights and privileges as may be incidental and
appurtenant thereto and the use thereof, including, but not restricted to, any
real or personal property acquired by such corporation from time to time in
the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations.
(4)  To acquire the good will, business, rights, real and personal property,
and other assets, or any part thereof, of such persons, firms, corporations,
joint stock companies, associations, or trusts as may be in furtherance of the
corporate purposes provided herein, and to assume, undertake, guarantee, or
pay the obligations, debts, and liabilities of any such person, firm,
corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust; to acquire improved
or unimproved real estate for the purpose of constructing industrial plants or
other business establishments thereon or for the purpose of disposing of such
real estate to others for the construction of industrial plants or other
business establishments, and, in furtherance of the corporate purposes, to
acquire, construct, or reconstruct, alter, repair, maintain, operate, sell,
lease, or otherwise dispose of industrial plants or business establishments.
(5)  To acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage,
pledge, or otherwise dispose of the stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes,
or other securities and evidences of interest in, or indebtedness of, any
person, firm, corporation, joint stock company, association, or trust, and
while the owner or holder thereof, to exercise all the rights, powers, and
privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon, but nothing
herein provided shall authorize the holding of securities of or otherwise
engaging directly or indirectly in a business where such holding of securities
or engaging in business is not authorized for corporations by general law.
(6)  To cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities of state departments
and other government agencies; and to cooperate with and assist, and otherwise
encourage, local organizations in the various communities in the state in the
promotion, assistance, and development of the business prosperity and economic
welfare of such communities and of the state.
